Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 198B Housing, Buildings, and Construction — Building Code

198B.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless otherwise provided:

“Assembly occupancy” means the occupancy or use of a building or structure or any portion thereof by a gathering of persons for civic, political, travel, religious, social, or recreational purposes, including among others:

Armories;

Assembly halls;

Auditoriums;

Bowling alleys;

Broadcasting studios;

Chapels;

Churches;

Clubrooms;

Community buildings;

Courthouses;

Dance halls;

Exhibition rooms;

Gymnasiums;

Hotels;

Lecture rooms;

Lodge rooms;

Motels;

Motion picture theaters;

Museums;

Night clubs;

Opera houses;

Passenger stations;

Pool rooms;

Recreation areas;

Restaurants;

Skating rinks;

“Attic” means the space between the ceiling beams of the top habitable story and the roof rafters.

“Basement” means that portion of a building the average height of which is at least half below grade, which is ordinarily used for purposes such as storage, laundry facilities, household tool shops, and installation and operation of heating, cooling, and ventilating facilities, but which is not ordinarily used for purposes of general household habitation.

“Building” means any combination of materials, whether portable or fixed, which comprises a structure or nonmine underground area affording facilities or shelter for any human occupancy, whether infrequent or regular, and also means single-family dwellings, including those sold or constructed under a trade or brand name. The word “building” shall be construed wherever used herein as if followed by the words “or part or parts thereof and all equipment therein” unless the context clearly requires a different meaning. “Building” shall also mean swimming pools constructed below grade on site, but not swimming pools assembled above grade on site. “Building” shall not mean a manufactured home governed by the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. secs. 5401 et seq., or a farm dwelling or other farm buildings and structures incident to the operation and maintenance of the farm if the farm structures are located outside the boundary of a municipality and are not used in the business of retail trade or used as a place of regular employment for ten (10) or more people or structures used in the storage or processing of timber products.

“Business occupancy” means the occupancy or use of a building or structure or any portion thereof for the transaction of business, the rendering or receiving of professional services, or the displaying, selling, or buying of goods, wares, or merchandise, or the housing of vehicles of transportation, except where occupancy is of high hazard, including among others:

Banks;

Barber shops;

Beauty parlors;

Department stores;

Garages;

Markets;

Service stations;

Offices;

Stores;

Radio stations;

Telephone exchanges; and

Television stations.

“Certified building inspector” means a person who has been certified by the department as having successfully completed the test requirements provided by KRS 198B.090 to practice as a city, county, or state building inspector within the Commonwealth.

“Certified plans and specifications inspector” means a person who has been certified by the department as having successfully completed the test requirements provided by KRS 198B.090 to practice as a city, county, or state plans and specifications inspector within the Commonwealth.

“Certified plumbing inspector” means a person who has been certified by the department as having successfully completed the test requirements provided by KRS 198B.090 and 318.140, or 318.090 to practice as a city, county, or state plumbing inspector within the Commonwealth.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the department.

“Committee” means the Housing, Buildings and Construction Advisory Committee established by KRS 198B.032.

“Construction” means the erection, fabrication, reconstruction, substantial alteration or conversion of a building, or the installation of equipment therein, but shall not include the ordinary repair of a building or structure.

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

“Educational occupancy” means the occupancy or use of a building or structure or any portion thereof by persons assembled for the purpose of learning or of receiving educational instruction. “Educational occupancy” shall not include a building for occupancy or use by thirty-five (35) persons or less assembled to receive religious and educational instruction. “Educational occupancy” includes but is not limited to:

Academies;

Care centers;

Colleges;

Kindergartens;

Libraries;

Preschools;

Relocatable classroom units;

Schools;

Seminaries; and

Universities.

“Equipment” means facilities or installations, including but not limited to heating, electrical, ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigerating facilities or installations.

“High hazard occupancy” means the occupancy or use of a building or structure or any portion thereof that involves highly combustible, highly flammable, or explosive materials or which has inherent characteristics that constitute a special fire hazard, including among others:

Aluminum powder factories;

Charging or filling stations;

Distilleries;

Dry cleaning plants;

Dry dyeing plants;

Explosive-manufacture, sale or storage;

Flour and feed mills;

Gasoline bulk plants;

Grain elevators;

Lacquer factories;

Liquefied petroleum gas;

Mattress factories;

Paint factories;

Pyroxylin-factories, or warehouses; and

Rubber factories.

“Industrial occupancy” means the occupancy or use of a building structure or any portion thereof for assembling, fabricating, finishing, manufacturing, packaging, or processing operations, except for occupancies of high hazard, including among others:

Assembly plants;

Creameries;

Electrical substations;

Factories;

Ice plants;

Laboratories;

Laundries;

Manufacturing plants;

Mills;

Power plants;

Processing plants;

Pumping stations;

Repair garages;

Smokehouses; and

Workshops.

“Industrialized building system” means any structure or component thereof which is wholly or in substantial part fabricated in an off-site manufacturing facility for installation or assembly on a permanent foundation at the building site.

“Institutional occupancy” means the occupancy or use of a building or structure or any portion thereof by persons harbored or detained to receive medical, charitable, or other care or treatment, or by persons involuntarily detained, including among others:

Asylums;

Homes for the aged;

Hospitals;

Houses of correction;

Infirmaries;

Jails;

Nursing homes;

Orphanages;

Penal institutions;

Reformatories;

Sanitariums; and

Nurseries.

“Mobile home” means mobile home as defined in KRS 227.550.

“Ordinary repair” means any nonstructural reconstruction or renewal of any part of an existing building for the purpose of its maintenance, or decoration, and shall include but not be limited to the replacement or installation of nonstructural components of the building such as roofing, siding, windows, storm windows, insulation, drywall or lath and plaster, or any other replacement, in kind, that does not alter the structural integrity, alter the occupancy or use of the building, or affect, by rearrangement, exitways and means of egress; but shall not include additions to, or alteration of, or relocation of any standpipe, water supply, sewer, drainage, gas, soil, waste, vent or similar piping, electric wiring, or mechanical equipment including furnaces and hot water heaters or other work affecting public health or safety.

“Story” means that part of a building comprised between a floor and the floor or roof next above which is not a basement or an attic.

“Person with a physical disability” means a person confined to a wheelchair; a person who uses braces or crutches; a person who because of the loss of a foot or leg or because of an arthritic, spastic, pulmonary, or cardiac condition, walks with difficulty or insecurity; a person who suffers from a faulty coordination or palsy; a person who is blind or whose sight is so impaired that, functioning in a public area, he or she is insecure or exposed to danger; a person whose hearing is so impaired that he or she is unable to hear warning signals; and a person whose mobility, flexibility, coordination, and perceptiveness are significantly reduced by aging.

“Facility for persons with physical disabilities” means any convenience or device which facilitates the health, safety, or comfort of a person with a disability, including, but not limited to, ramps, handrails, elevators, and doors.

“Manufactured home” is defined as in KRS 227.550.

(aa)
Television studios;

(bb)
Theaters.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 361, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 308, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 405, § 49, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 340, § 15, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 9, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 223, § 2, effective April 22, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 245, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.020.
Board of Housing, Buildings and Construction. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 270, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 331, § 32, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 426, § 133, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 172, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 256, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 246, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 114, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.030.
Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction — Comments from advisory committee to be received before promulgating administrative regulations.

There is hereby created the Kentucky Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction within the Public Protection Cabinet. The Governor shall appoint a commissioner to head the department. The commissioner shall receive for his or her services such compensation as the Governor shall determine.

The commissioner may employ sufficient staff to carry out the functions of the commissioner’s office. Neither the commissioner nor any member of his or her staff shall be employed, either directly or indirectly, in any aspect of the building industry as regulated by this chapter while employed by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

The department shall perform all budgeting, procurement, and other administrative activities necessary for the statewide regulation and enforcement of building, construction, and inspection standards and codes. The department or commissioner shall submit any proposed administrative regulation to the committee and shall not promulgate the administrative regulation without giving the committee the opportunity to produce written comments, as required by subsection (8) of this section. If the committee chooses to produce written comments, the comments shall be attached to any public submission of the administrative regulation, including any filing under KRS Chapter 13A.

The department may enter into contracts or agreements with the federal government, its subdivisions and instrumentalities, other agencies of state government or with its subdivisions and instrumentalities, or with private profit or nonprofit organizations in order to effect the purposes of this chapter.

The commissioner shall cooperate with the agencies of the United States and with the governing bodies and housing authorities of counties, cities, and with not for profit organizations and area development districts in relation to matters set forth in this chapter, and in any reasonable manner that may be necessary for the state to qualify for, and to receive grants or aid from these agencies. The commissioner shall have the power to comply with each condition and execute any agreement that may be necessary, convenient, or desirable.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude any other agency, board, or officer of the state from being designated as the directing or allocating agency, board, or officer for the distribution of federal grants and aid, or the performance of other duties to the extent necessary to qualify for and to receive grants and aid for programs under the administration of the department.

The commissioner is authorized to receive, for and on behalf of the state and the department from the United States and agencies thereof, and from any and all other sources, grants and aid and gifts made for the purpose of providing, or to assist in providing, any of the programs authorized by this chapter, including expenses of administration. All funds received under this subsection shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to a trust and agency fund to be used by the department in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. No part of this fund shall revert to the general fund of the Commonwealth.

If the department has proposed a new or amended administrative regulation that directly and clearly relates to the work of a profession, class of workers, or industry that is under the authority of the committee, the department shall not promulgate the proposed administrative regulation without first receiving comments from the committee, subject to the restrictions of paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(8) (a)

If the department has proposed a new or amended administrative regulation that directly and clearly relates to the work of a profession, class of workers, or industry that is under the authority of the committee, the department shall not promulgate the proposed administrative regulation without first receiving comments from the committee, subject to the restrictions of paragraph (b) of this subsection.

The committee shall be granted a maximum of thirty (30) days to submit its comments on the proposed regulatory change. This subparagraph does not apply to an administrative regulation that is a new emergency administrative regulation.
(b) 1.

The committee shall be granted a maximum of thirty (30) days to submit its comments on the proposed regulatory change. This subparagraph does not apply to an administrative regulation that is a new emergency administrative regulation.

The time limits in this paragraph shall begin from the day the department submits the regulatory change and sets a date for a proposed hearing for the comments of the committee. If the committee is already scheduled to meet at a time that will give it an adequate opportunity to review the administrative regulation and respond, the hearing may be held at that meeting.

If the committee is not scheduled to meet or meets only at the call of the department, the department shall arrange for the committee to meet at a time that will allow the committee an adequate opportunity to review and comment on the regulation within the time limit. If the committee fails to comment within the time limit, the department may proceed with the administrative changes at its discretion.

To the extent that any other statute relating to the department’s authority to promulgate administrative regulations conflicts with this section, this section shall take precedence.

The department may issue advisory opinions and declaratory rulings related to KRS Chapters 198B, 227, 227A, 236, and 318 and the administrative regulations promulgated under those chapters.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 109, § 28, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 256, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 247, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.032.
Housing, Buildings and Construction Advisory Committee.

The Housing, Buildings and Construction Advisory Committee is established within the department and shall be composed of the following seventeen (17) voting members:

The commissioner of the department or the commissioner’s designee;

The state fire marshal or a representative of the state fire marshal’s office;

The director of the Building Code Enforcement Division within the department; and

Fourteen (14) members appointed by the Governor:

At least one (1) of whom shall be a licensed heating, ventilation, and air conditioning contractor;

At least one (1) of whom shall be a licensed plumber;

At least one (1) of whom shall be a licensed elevator mechanic or elevator contractor;

At least one (1) of whom shall be a licensed electrician;

At least one (1) of whom shall be a licensed engineer;

At least one (1) of whom shall be a licensed architect;

At least one (1) of whom shall be a manufactured or mobile home retailer or certified installer; and

The remaining seven (7) of whom shall have experience in the housing, building, or construction industries.

Each committee member appointed under subsection (1)(d) of this section shall serve a term of three (3) years, except that initial appointments shall be staggered by the Governor. A member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee shall serve as chair of the committee. The committee shall annually elect a member to serve as vice chair.

The committee shall meet at least quarterly, and a majority of the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. If a vote on a matter before the committee results in a tie, the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee shall cast an additional deciding vote.

Committee members who are not full-time state government employees shall be compensated for their time when attending committee meetings or performing official duties as directed by the committee at the rate of fifty dollars ($50) per day. Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for all expenses paid or incurred in the discharge of official business consistent with the reimbursement policy for state employees.

The committee shall provide ongoing advice and input to the department, but shall not become directly involved in the licensing or regulation of housing, buildings, and construction matters by the department.

The department shall give the committee thirty (30) days to review and comment on a proposed administrative regulation before the regulation is promulgated, amended, or repealed, except in the case of an emergency administrative regulation.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.035.
Transfer of other agency functions to department. [Repealed.]

198B.040.
General powers and duties of the department.

The department shall have the following general powers and duties:

To conduct or cause to be conducted studies to determine the needs of the building industry of Kentucky;

To conduct or cause to be conducted or participate in studies of the costs of the various factors of building construction and use of buildings and to recommend programs and procedures which will minimize the cost of buildings, including the use of energy, while maintaining safety, durability, and comfort;

To administer regulatory legislation relating to buildings and construction;

To assume administrative coordination of the various state construction review programs and to cooperate with various federal, state, and local agencies in the programs as they relate to buildings and construction;

To assume administration and coordination of various state housing programs to include:

Devising and implementing procedures, in conjunction with the Department for Local Government, for attaining and maintaining an accurate count of the housing inventory in Kentucky, including information on the age, physical condition, size, facilities, and amenities of this housing, and housing constructed and demolished each year;

Designing programs coordinating the elements of housing finance, production, maintenance, and rehabilitation for the purpose of assuring the availability of safe, adequate housing in a healthful environment for all Kentucky citizens;

Establishing or causing to be established public information and educational programs relating to housing, to include informing Kentucky citizens about housing and housing related programs that are available on all levels of government;

Designing and administering, or participating in the design and administration of educational programs to prepare low income families for home ownership, and counseling them during their early years as homeowners;

Promoting educational programs to assist sponsors in the development and management of low and moderate income housing for sale or rental;

Cooperating with various federal, state, and local agencies in their programs as they relate to housing; and

Conducting or causing to be conducted studies to determine the housing preferences of Kentucky citizens and the present and future housing requirements of the state;

To recommend state building industry policies and goals to the Kentucky General Assembly;

To adopt and promulgate a mandatory uniform state building code, and parts thereof, which shall establish standards for the construction of all buildings, as defined in KRS 198B.010, in the state;

To promulgate administrative regulations providing for the proper construction of public water purification plants, other than the water treatment equipment and systems in those plants. Any administrative regulation promulgated under this subsection shall require that applications for permits to build public water purification plants be submitted by the department to the Energy and Environment Cabinet for that cabinet’s comments. Any submitted administrative regulations shall require the Energy and Environment Cabinet’s comments to be completed and returned to the department within sixty (60) days;

To promulgate administrative regulations providing for the proper construction of sewage treatment plants, other than the sewage treatment equipment and systems in such plants. Any administrative regulation promulgated under this subsection shall require that applications for permits to build public sewage treatment plants be submitted by the department to the Energy and Environment Cabinet for that cabinet’s comments. Any submitted administrative regulations shall require the Energy and Environment Cabinet’s comments to be completed and returned to the department within sixty (60) days; and

To promulgate administrative regulations for the safe installation and operation of plumbing and plumbing fixtures.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 69, § 71, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 256, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 88, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 248, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 117, § 84, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.050.
Uniform State Building Code.

The department shall adopt and promulgate a mandatory Uniform State Building Code that establishes standards for the construction of all buildings, as defined in KRS 198B.010, in the state. The code shall provide that the review and approval, as necessary, of building plans for conformance with the Uniform State Building Code prior to construction approval shall be conducted only by the department or a local government or governments delegated such responsibilities by this chapter, and any exceptions to this policy shall be explicitly stated in the code.

The code shall be comprehensive and shall include but not be limited to provisions for general construction; structural quality; mechanical systems to include heating, cooling, and ventilation; electrical systems; and life safety from hazards of fire, explosion, and other disasters, whether caused by acts of nature or man. The code shall encompass the Kentucky State Plumbing Code promulgated pursuant to KRS 318.130, boiler rules and regulations issued pursuant to KRS 236.030, and the national electrical code.

This code shall be designed after and may be selected from the models offered by such model code agencies as the International Code Council, Inc., the National Fire Protection Association, and other nationally recognized organizations which may include governmental agencies. The code shall:

Provide uniform standards and requirements for construction and construction materials;

To the extent practicable, set forth standards, specifications, and requirements in terms of performance objectives, so as to facilitate the use of new technologies, techniques, and materials. The code shall not discriminate in favor of particular suppliers’ materials, techniques, or technologies; and

Protect the public health, safety, and welfare within the state.

The code shall include provisions for the continuing review and possible adoption of new materials, technologies, and techniques in the building industry when deemed justified by the department to fulfill the purposes of this chapter. The department may adopt a model code promulgated by a model code agency only if that agency provides a method for democratic participation by the department and any local governments which may enforce the code, in a continuing review and possible adoption of new materials, technologies, and techniques in the building industry.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations, after notice in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, which are necessary to implement the Uniform State Building Code or to carry out any other responsibility assigned to the department by this chapter.

The department shall monitor the effectiveness of agencies designated by local governments to enforce the provisions of the Uniform State Building Code.

If the department determines that an agency is not enforcing the provisions of the Uniform State Building Code, it shall determine where deficiencies exist. The department shall require the local government to correct the deficiencies within sixty (60) days and report to the department its method of correcting the deficiencies.

If the local government fails to correct the deficiencies, the department may preempt the local program as provided for in KRS 198B.060(4).

The department shall provide for the supply, including amendments and revisions thereto, of sufficient copies of the Uniform State Building Code for all interested parties.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 308, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 249, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.